Washington statutes.
RCW 35.91.040

Contract payment to be made prior to tap, connection, or use—Removal of tap or connection.

(1) A person, firm, or corporation may not be granted a permit or be authorized to tap into, or use any such water or sewer facilities or extensions thereof during the period of time prescribed in such contract without first paying to the municipality, in addition to any and all other costs and charges made or assessed for such tap, or use, or for the water lines or sewers constructed in connection therewith, the amount required by the provisions of the contract under which the water or sewer facilities so tapped into or used were constructed. All amounts so received by the municipality shall be paid out by it under the terms of such contract within sixty days after the receipt thereof. Whenever any tap or connection is made into any such contracted water or sewer facilities without such payment having first been made, the governing body of the municipality may remove, or cause to be removed, such unauthorized tap or connection and all connecting tile, or pipe located in the facility right-of-way and dispose of unauthorized material so removed without any liability whatsoever.

(2) A tap or connection charge under this section for service to a manufactured housing community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, applies to an individual lot within that community only if the municipality provides and maintains the tap-in connection.

[ 2005 c 324 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.91.040. Prior: 1959 c 261 s 4.]